California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) The state plan shall include, but not be limited to, all state plan requirements contained in subtitles A and B of Title I of Public Law 106-402 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.), or requirements established by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 32.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4562.

(a) The state council shall conduct activities necessary to develop and implement the state plan in the various regions of the state.

(b) The state plan and its implementation shall be responsive to the needs of the state’s diverse geographic, racial, ethnic, and language communities.

(c) In preparing this plan, the council may utilize information provided by any regional offices and regional advisory committees of the state council, statewide and local entities, individuals with developmental disabilities, family members, and other interested parties, to help identify and prioritize actions needed to improve
 California’s system of services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities.

(d) The purpose of the plan shall be to ensure a coordinated and comprehensive system of community services and supports that is consumer and family centered and consumer and family directed, and to enable individuals with developmental disabilities to exercise self-determination, independence, productivity, and to be integrated and included in all facets of community life.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 33.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4563.

The state council shall assess the extent to which services, supports, and other forms of assistance are available to individuals with developmental disabilities and their families throughout the state and for the diverse populations of the state. The state council shall develop goals and objectives, based on the identified needs and priorities, to be included in the state plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 35.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4564.

The state council shall conduct public hearings on the state plan and related budgetary issues prior to submission of the plan pursuant to Section 4565.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 36.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4565.

(a) The state plan shall be given to the Governor, the Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency, the University Centers for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities established pursuant to the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, the protection and advocacy agency designated by the Governor to fulfill the requirements and assurances of the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction for review and comment prior to its submission by the chairperson of the state council to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(b) Copies of the
 state plan shall be provided, no later than November 1 of each year, to the Director of Finance and to the Legislature for guidance in the development of the Governor’s Budget and legislative review of the budget, and for guidance in other legislation pertaining to programs for persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 37.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4567.

All state agencies shall cooperate with the reasonable requests of the state council by providing information to the state council in the preparation of the state plan. Any expenditures incurred by state agencies in providing this assistance to the state council shall be identified in the state plan and in the state agency’s annual budget. These expenditures may be funded in whole or in part by state funds appropriated as the required state share of the developmental disabilities program, or by federal funds from Public Law 106-402, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.), or both, when the state council allots funds for these purposes in the state plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4568.

In no event shall the state council allot federal funds from Public Law 106-402, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15001 et seq.), to state agencies to replace state funds currently allocated to those agencies for the purpose of planning programs for persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 676, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Quality Assessments [4571. - 4572.]

4571.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure the well-being of consumers, taking into account their informed and expressed choices. It is further the intent of the Legislature to support the satisfaction and success of consumers through the delivery of quality services and supports. Evaluation of the services that consumers receive is a key aspect to the service system. Utilizing the information that consumers and their families provide about those services in a reliable and meaningful way is also critical to enable the department to assess the performance of the state’s developmental services system and to improve services for consumers in the future. To that end, the State Department of Developmental Services, on or before January 1, 2010, shall implement an improved, unified quality assessment system, in accordance with
 this section.

(b) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall identify a valid and reliable quality assurance instrument that assesses consumer and family satisfaction, provision of services in a linguistically and culturally competent manner, and personal outcomes. The instrument shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide nationally validated, benchmarked, consistent, reliable, and measurable data for the department’s Quality Management System.

(2) Enable the department and regional centers to compare the performance of California’s developmental services system against other states’ developmental services systems and to assess quality and performance among all of the regional centers.

(3) Include outcome-based measures such as health,
 safety, well-being, relationships, interactions with people who do not have a disability, employment, quality of life, integration, choice, service, and consumer satisfaction.

(4) Include outcome-based measures to evaluate the linguistic and cultural competency of regional center services that are provided to consumers across their lifetimes.

(c) To the extent that funding is available, the instrument identified in subdivision (b) may be expanded to collect additional data requested by the State Council on Developmental Disabilities.

(d) (1) The department shall contract with an independent agency or organization to implement, by January 1, 2010, the quality assurance instrument described in subdivision (b). The contractor shall be experienced in all of the following:

(A) Designing valid quality assurance instruments for developmental service systems.

(B) Tracking outcome-based measures such as health, safety, well-being, relationships, interactions with people who do not have a disability, employment, quality of life, integration, choice, service, and consumer satisfaction.

(C) Developing data systems.

(D) Data analysis and report preparation.

(E) Assessments of the services received by consumers who are moved from developmental centers to the community, given the Legislature’s historic recognition of a special obligation to ensure the well-being of these persons.

(F) Issues related to
 linguistic and cultural competency.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the contract and any amendments pursuant to this section shall be exempt from all of the following:

(A) The personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(B) The Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual, and the State Administration Manual.

(C) The approval of the Department of General Services.

(D) The approval of the Department of Technology.

(3) The exemptions specified in paragraph (2) shall remain in effect until there is more
 than one available assessment that meets the criteria in subdivision (b) from an organization that also meets the criteria in this subdivision.

(e) The department, in consultation with the contractor described in subdivision (d), shall establish the methodology by which the quality assurance instrument shall be administered, including, but not limited to, how often and to whom the quality assurance will be administered, and the design of a stratified, random sample among the entire population of consumers served by regional centers. The contractor shall provide aggregate information for all regional centers and the state as a whole. At the request of a consumer or the family member of a consumer, the survey shall be conducted in the primary language of the consumer or family member surveyed.

(f) The department shall contract with the state council to collect data for the quality
 assurance instrument described in subdivision (b). If, during the data collection process, the state council identifies any suspected violation of the legal, civil, or service rights of a consumer, or if it determines that the health and welfare of a consumer is at risk, that information shall be provided immediately to the regional center providing case management services to the consumer. At the request of the consumer or family, when appropriate, a copy of the completed survey shall be provided to the regional center providing case management services to improve the consumer’s quality of services through the individual planning process.

(g) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall annually review the data collected from and the findings of the quality assurance instrument described in subdivision (b) and accept recommendations regarding additional or different criteria for the quality assurance instrument in order to assess
 the performance of the state’s developmental services system and improve services for consumers.

(h) (1) Each regional center shall annually present data collected from, and the findings of, the quality assurance instrument described in subdivision (b) for that regional center, at a public meeting of its governing board in order to assess the comparative performance of the regional center and identify needed improvements in services for consumers, including, but not limited to, case management services. Notice of this meeting shall also be posted on the regional center’s internet website at least 30 days prior to the meeting and shall be sent to regional center consumers and families and individual stakeholders at least 30 days prior to the meeting. The governing board shall provide a sufficient public comment period so members of the public may provide comments. Each regional center, in holding the meeting required by
 this subdivision, shall ensure that the meeting and meeting materials provide language access, as required by state and federal law.

(2) All regional center-specific reports generated by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be made publicly available on the regional center’s internet website in a machine-readable format, but shall not contain any personal identifying information about any person assessed.

(3) Within 60 days following its annual presentation, each regional center shall submit a report to the department regarding its implementation of the requirements of this section. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, both of the following:

(A) Copies of the presentation described in paragraph (1), minutes from the meeting, and attendee comments.

(B) The regional center’s recommendations and plans to use the information to address regional center priorities, strategic directions to improve specific areas of performance, or both.

(i) All reports generated pursuant to this section shall be made publicly available, but shall not contain any personal identifying information about any person assessed.

(j) All data collected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be provided to the state council, but shall not contain personal identifying information about the persons being surveyed.

(k) Implementation of this section shall be subject to an annual appropriation of funds in the Budget Act for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 17.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4572.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall develop and implement a plan to monitor, evaluate, and improve the quality of community-based services through the use of a performance dashboard. The department shall work with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, regional centers, consumer advocates, providers, and the Legislature, on the development of the dashboard. The dashboard shall be published annually and in a machine-readable format. Each regional center shall publish its own dashboard and shall post a link to the department’s dashboard on its internet website. The dashboard shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following metrics:

(a) Recognized quality and access measures.

(b) Measures to
 indicate the movement toward compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based Services Waiver rules (CMS 2249-F and CMS 2296-F).

(c) Measures to evaluate the changes in the number of consumers who work in competitive integrated employment.

(d) (1) Until February 1, 2027, the number of complaints referred to the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4731, for every 1,000 consumers served, by each regional center.

(2) Commencing February 1, 2027, the information described in subdivision (o) of Section
 4891.

(e) The number of administrative fair hearings held pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 4710) of Chapter 7, separated by eligibility and service issues, for individuals ages three and over, for every one thousand consumers served, by each regional center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 24.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.1. Master Plan for Developmental Services in California [4580. - 4581.]

4580.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) More than 460,000 Californians who have intellectual and developmental disabilities are currently served at the State Department of Developmental Services’ 21 regional centers. Since 2019, the number of Californians served by the state’s developmental services system has grown by 31 percent, with significant growth among young people of color under 22 years of age who have an autism diagnosis.

(2) The experiences and outcomes of Californians served by the state’s developmental services system impact not only people with disabilities, but also their families and local communities.

(3) California is the only state in the nation that provides developmental services and supports as an entitlement, with an intentional focus on home- and community-based services.

(4) Over the last decade, California and the federal government have prioritized the inclusion of people with intellectual and developmental disabilities in their communities, while avoiding institutional settings.

(5) Individuals receiving services through California’s developmental services system are often deeply connected to other health and social systems. Across the state, people with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families rely on services provided through multiple state and local entities, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Health Care Services,
 the California Department of Aging, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Rehabilitation, and the State Department of Education.

(6) Multiple entities have issued reports identifying opportunities for improving consumer experiences and the provision of developmental services, including the California State Auditor’s Office in 2021 and the Little Hoover Commission in 2023.

(7) These reports and other research studies have identified the following:

(A) There are wide racial, ethnic, and geographic disparities in the access to services provided in the developmental services system, as measured by purchase of service spending.

(B) Consumer experiences vary significantly across the 21 regional centers, reflecting variation in policies
 and processes across the regional centers.

(C) There are challenges faced by individuals and families navigating programs or systems that provide “generic” services and that are required to be accessed by consumers before receiving funded services through a regional center.

(D) For several years, staffing models have led to many regional centers assigning more consumers to each service coordinator than authorized by statutory staffing requirements, which has limited the abilities of service coordinators to assist individuals and families in accessing services.

(8) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services appointed members of the Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee for a one-year term, with the intent that they collectively deliver a master plan by March of 2025.

(9) In 2024, the California Health and Human Services Agency will engage in outreach activities such as roundtable discussions and focus groups in communities across the state to learn about the lived experiences of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, their families, and system partners.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter that a Master Plan for Developmental Services is developed that strengthens accessibility, quality, and equity of the developmental services system for all system consumers and their families, regardless of their language spoken, demographic group, geographic region, or socioeconomic status, and improves the accountability and transparency of the systems supporting them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 5.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4580.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 162), the Legislature established its intent that the Master Plan for Developmental Services be developed with the intent to strengthen accessibility, quality, and equity for all consumers of the developmental services system and their families, no matter their demographic groups, geographic region, or socioeconomic status.

(2) In 2024, the California Health and Human Services Agency appointed members of the Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee and held roundtable discussions in communities across the state to learn about the lived
 experiences of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, their families, and system partners.

(3) The California Health and Human Services Agency published the Master Plan for Developmental Services on March 28, 2025. As stated by the California Health and Human Services Agency, the Master Plan for Developmental Services is a community-driven vision with recommendations intended to improve the ways that California supports people with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families into the future. These recommendations will inform California’s ongoing work to provide better developmental services and supports, improve coordination across systems, and increase the attainment of desired life outcomes among individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(4) The Master Plan for Developmental Services states that the community’s
 recommendations will inform several State Department of Developmental Services workgroups, including, but not limited to, the Lived Experience Advisory Group, an expanded and renamed group formerly known as the Consumer Advisory Committee, the Quality Incentive Program workgroup, the Regional Center Performance Measures workgroup, and the Quality Assurance Advisory Group.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Health and Human Services Agency, in consultation with relevant departments and agencies across state government, provide the Legislature with information on next steps and a structure for implementation of Master Plan for Developmental Services recommendations with ongoing updates on implementation progress.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 12, Sec. 3.   (AB 143)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4581.

(a) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services, in coordination with the State Department of Developmental Services, shall lead the development and implementation of the Master Plan for Developmental Services referenced in Governor Gavin Newsom’s January 2024 Budget proposal and in the subsequent proclamation by the Governor that declared March 2024 as Developmental Disabilities Awareness Month.

(b) Other state entities that interact with the State Department of Developmental Services shall be included in discussions with the Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee, as applicable. These entities shall include, but not be limited to, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of
 Rehabilitation, the California Department of Aging, the State Department of Education, and the agencies listed in subdivision (g).

(c) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall solicit input through the committee, or through other means, from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, professionals in the developmental services field, and a broad range of subject matter experts on topics that may include, but are not limited to, regional center board accountability and transparency and the evaluation of regional centers, including performance, equity, and diversity.

(d) When the California Health and Human Services Agency convenes meetings of the master plan committee, the information and materials about the work of the master plan committee shall be posted on the California Health and Human Services Agency’s internet website
 in a timely manner.

(e) By March 15, 2025, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall submit an initial report to the Governor and the Legislature that summarizes the recommended components of the master plan resulting from the master plan committee advisory process, the community roundtable discussions, and the public comment received.

(f) The Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee shall meet at least two times each year, commencing in 2025 and ending on March 15, 2036, or when the final master plan implementation update is submitted, whichever date is later.

(g) The secretary and the director shall work with other state agencies and departments, as necessary, to identify policies, efficiencies, and strategies necessary to implement the master plan, which may include any of the
 following:

(1) The California Health and Human Services Agency.

(2) The Government Operations Agency.

(3) The State Department of Education.

(4) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(5) The Transportation Agency.

(6) The Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency.

(7) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(8) The office of the Treasurer.

(h) The workgroup shall solicit input from
 stakeholders and gather information on the experiences of Californians with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families in the implementation process of the master plan.

(i) (1) By March 15, 2026, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the department shall provide an initial report on implementation of any master plan recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature that includes all of the following information:

(A) The administration’s high-level priorities for the developmental services system through the 2027–28 fiscal year in light of the broad themes identified in the master plan’s recommendations.

(B) A listing of the specific master plan recommendations that the administration considers to be feasible and likely to advance as near-term priorities. For
 each recommendation, all of the following shall be noted:

(i) Whether the recommendation may require an appropriation of additional funding.

(ii) Whether statutory changes may be required.

(iii) The extent to which the recommendation relates to existing efforts already underway.

(C) The existing or newly created workgroups to which each of the master plan’s recommendations is related. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide information for individuals served, their families, stakeholders, and the general public to more clearly track progress on implementing recommendations.

(D) Budget change proposals in the Governor’s Budget for the 2026–27 fiscal year that tie to master plan
 recommendations.

(2) (A) Following the initial report to be submitted by March 15, 2026, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the department shall submit master plan recommendation updates to the Governor and the Legislature annually beginning March 15, 2027, through March 15, 2036, inclusive. The updates shall include, but are not limited to, identification of any statutory changes as well as additional funding requirements considered necessary to effectively implement recommendations from the plan and identification of recommendations that have been implemented.

(B) The updates shall also include a narrative summary of the Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee meetings that will occur at least two times per year pursuant to subdivision (f), including themes identified in public comment provided at these meetings. As part of these
 summaries, Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee members shall have the option to submit written commentary on the degree to which progress is made on the master plan’s recommendations, as well as any suggestions for ongoing implementation of master plan recommendations.

(j) For any State Department of Developmental Services budget change proposal submitted through 2035, the department shall include a narrative description of how the proposal addresses any recommendations included in the Master Plan for Developmental Services, if applicable.

(k) Any funding needed to support program enhancements proposed in the master plan is subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for those purposes.

(l) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of
 the Government Code.

(m) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2026, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 103.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 104 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

4581.

(a) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services, in coordination with the State Department of Developmental Services, shall lead the development and implementation of the Master Plan for Developmental Services referenced in Governor Gavin Newsom’s January 2024 Budget proposal and in the subsequent proclamation by the Governor that declared March 2024 as Developmental Disabilities Awareness Month.

(b) Other state entities that interact with the State Department of Developmental Services shall be included in discussions with the Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee, as applicable. These entities shall include, but not be limited to, the State Department of Health
 Care Services, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Rehabilitation, the California Department of Aging, the State Department of Education, and the agencies listed in subdivision (g).

(c) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall solicit input through the committee, or through other means, from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, professionals in the developmental services field, and a broad range of subject matter experts on topics that may include, but are not limited to, regional center board accountability and transparency and the evaluation of regional centers, including performance, equity, and diversity.

(d) When the California Health and Human Services Agency convenes
 meetings of the master plan committee, the information and materials about the work of the master plan committee shall be posted on the California Health and Human Services Agency’s internet website in a timely manner.

(e) By March 15, 2025, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services shall submit an initial report to the Governor and the Legislature that summarizes the recommended components of the master plan resulting from the master plan committee advisory process, the community roundtable discussions, and the public comment received.

(f) The Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee shall meet at least two times each year, commencing in 2025 and ending on March 15, 2036, or when the final master plan implementation update is submitted,
 whichever date is later.

(g) The secretary and the director shall work with other state agencies and departments, as necessary, to identify policies, efficiencies, and strategies necessary to implement the master plan, which may include any of the following:

(1) The California Health and Human Services Agency.

(2) The Government Operations Agency.

(3) The State Department of Education.

(4) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(5) The Transportation Agency.

(6) The California Housing and Homelessness Agency.

(7) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(8) The office of the Treasurer.

(h) The workgroup shall solicit input from stakeholders and gather information on the experiences of Californians with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families in the
 implementation process of the master plan.

(i) (1) By March 15, 2026, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the department shall provide an initial report on implementation of any master plan recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature that includes all of the following information:

(A) The administration’s high-level priorities for the developmental services system through the 2027–28 fiscal year in light of the broad themes identified in the master plan’s recommendations.

(B) A listing of the specific master plan recommendations that the administration considers to be feasible and likely
 to advance as near-term priorities. For each recommendation, all of the following shall be noted:

(i) Whether the recommendation may require an appropriation of additional funding.

(ii) Whether statutory changes may be required.

(iii) The extent to which the recommendation relates to existing efforts already underway.

(C) The existing or newly created workgroups to which each of the master plan’s recommendations is related. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide information for individuals served,
 their families, stakeholders, and the general public to more clearly track progress on implementing recommendations.

(D) Budget change proposals in the Governor’s Budget for the 2026–27 fiscal year that tie to master plan recommendations.

(2) (A) Following the initial report to be submitted by March 15, 2026, the California Health and Human Services Agency and the department shall submit master plan recommendation updates to the Governor and the Legislature annually beginning March 15, 2027, through March 15, 2036, inclusive. The updates shall include, but are not limited to, identification of any statutory changes as well as additional funding requirements considered necessary to effectively implement recommendations from the plan and
 identification of recommendations that have been implemented.

(B) The updates shall also include a narrative summary of the Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee meetings that will occur at least two times per year pursuant to subdivision (f), including themes identified in public comment provided at these meetings. As part of these summaries, Master Plan for Developmental Services Committee members shall have the option to submit written commentary on the degree to which progress is made on the master plan’s recommendations, as well as any suggestions for ongoing implementation of master plan recommendations.

(j) For any State Department of Developmental Services budget change proposal submitted through 2035, the department shall include a
 narrative description of how the proposal addresses any recommendations included in the Master Plan for Developmental Services, if applicable.

(k) Any funding needed to support program enhancements proposed in the master plan is subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for those purposes.

(l) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 103) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 104.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Regional Centers for Persons With Developmental Disabilities [4620. - 4669.75.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regional Center Contracts [4620. - 4639.76.]

4620.

(a) In order for the state to carry out many of its responsibilities as established in this division, the state shall contract with appropriate agencies to provide fixed points of contact in the community for persons with developmental disabilities and their families, to the end that these persons may have access to the services and supports best suited to them throughout their lifetime. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division that the network of regional centers for persons with developmental disabilities and their
 families be accessible to every family in need of regional center services. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the design and activities of regional centers reflect a strong commitment to the delivery of direct service coordination and that all other operational expenditures of regional centers are necessary to support and enhance the delivery of direct service coordination and services and supports identified in individual program plans.

(b) The Legislature finds that the service provided to individuals and their families by regional centers is of such a special and unique nature that it cannot be satisfactorily provided by state agencies. Therefore, private nonprofit community agencies shall be utilized by the state for the purpose of operating regional centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1011, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.1.

The Legislature recognizes the ongoing contributions many parents and family members make to the support and well-being of their children and relatives with developmental disabilities. It is the intent of the Legislature that the important nature of these relationships be respected and fostered by regional centers and providers of direct services and supports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1011, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.2.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services, after consultation with stakeholder groups, shall develop a system of enrollment fees, copayments, or both, to be assessed against the parents of each child between the ages of three and 17 years who lives in the parent’s home and receives services purchased through a regional center. This system shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before April 1, 2004, immediately prior to the fiscal year in which the system is to be implemented, and as a part of the Governor’s proposed 2004–05
 budget or subsequent legislation.

(b) The department, after consultation with stakeholder groups, shall submit a detailed plan for implementing a parental copayment system for children receiving services purchased through a regional center. This plan shall be submitted to the Legislature by April 1, 2004.

(c) The plan submitted on or before April 1, 2004, pursuant to subdivision (b), and any resources requested in the 2004–05 Governor’s Budget and related authority may be subsequently modified during the legislative review process.

(d) The parental copayment system shall only be applicable to families that have adjusted gross family incomes of over 200 percent of the federal poverty level and that have a child who meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The child is receiving services purchased through a regional center.

(2) The child is living at home.

(3) The child is not otherwise eligible to receive services provided under the Medi-Cal program.

(4) The child is at least three years of age and not more than 17 years of age.

(e) The department’s plan shall address, at a minimum all of the following components for the development of a parental copayment system:

(1) Description of the families and children affected, including those families with more than one child as described under subdivision (d).

(2) Privacy issues and potential safeguards regarding the
 families’ income, the children’s regional center clinical records, and related matters.

(3) Schedule of parental copayments and any other related assessments, and criteria or service thresholds for which these copayments and assessments are based.

(4) The options for a sliding scale for the schedule of parental copayments based on family income and family size.

(5) Proposed limits on parental cost sharing.

(6) An exemption process for families who are experiencing financial hardships and may need deferral or waiver of any copayments or assessments.

(7) An appeal process for families who may dispute the level of copayment or assessments for which they are billed.

(8) The specific methods and processes to be used by the department, regional centers, or other responsible party, for the collection of all parental copayments and assessments.

(9) Any potentials for the disruption of services to applicable regional center consumers due to the implementation of a parental copayment system.

(10) The estimated amount of revenues to be collected and any applicable assumptions made for making this determination.

(11) Any estimate related to a slowing of the trend in the growth for regional center services due to the implementation of a parental copayment system.

(12) A comparison to how the State Department of Health Services and other state agencies utilize
 personal information to manage the delivery of benefits and assessment of copayments.

(13) A recommendation on whether the parental copayment system should be centralized at the department or decentralized in the regional centers and the basis for this recommendation.
